Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB74.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) For tax years 2025 through 2027, there shall be allowed
a credit against the tax liability of a resident individual imposed under the
Kansas income tax act in an amount equal to 25% of the expenditures
made by the individual during such tax year to purchase lockable gun and
ammunition storage that is designed primarily for gun and ammunition
storage. The amount of such credit allowed each tax year shall not exceed
$250 for any taxpayer.
(b) If the amount of the credit allowed by subsection (a) exceeds the
taxpayer's income tax liability imposed under the Kansas income tax act,
such excess amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer for the tax year in
which the credit is allowed, the amount of credit that exceeds such tax
liability may be carried forward for deduction from the taxpayer's
income tax liability in the next succeeding tax year or years until the
total amount of the credit has been deducted from tax liability.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.